Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.03.010

Purposes.

(1) Every corporation incorporated under this title has the purpose of engaging in any lawful business unless a more limited purpose is set forth in the articles of incorporation.

(2) Corporations organized for the purposes of banking or engaging in business as an insurer shall not be organized under this title.

[ 1989 c 165 s 33.]